California statutes. Civil Code
(c) This section does not limit or preclude a defendant from presenting either of the following:

(1) Any other affirmative defense, including evidence relevant to causation or foreseeability.

(2) Other evidence relevant to the comparative fault of any other person or entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 672, Sec. 1.   (AB 316)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.47.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Business information” means an internet website, mobile application, address, or telephone number through which a seller offers to sell, or a consumer makes a purchase of, a product.

(2) “Cannabis” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (f) of Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) “Cannabis product” has the same meaning as that term is defined in subdivision (k) of Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.

(4) “Intoxicating hemp product” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 22944 of the Business and Professions Code.

(5) “Licensed” means licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(6) “Online marketplace” means an online cannabis marketplace, as that term is defined in Section 22943 of the Business and Professions Code, or an online hemp marketplace, as that term is defined in Section 22944 of the Business and Professions Code.

(7) “Unlawful
 paid online advertising” means an advertisement or promotional information displayed on a computer or mobile device about, or for an offer of, the sale of cannabis or a cannabis product by an unlicensed seller, or an intoxicating hemp product, for which an online marketplace receives compensation either directly from a business or indirectly by increasing the number of individuals who visit the marketplace.

(b) (1) An online marketplace shall not engage in
 unlawful paid online advertising related to unlicensed sellers of cannabis or cannabis products or intoxicating hemp products.

(2) An online marketplace that engages in unlawful paid online advertising related to unlicensed sellers of cannabis or cannabis products in violation of paragraph (1) and is a substantial factor in an unlawful transaction between a consumer and an unlicensed seller of cannabis or a cannabis product shall be jointly and severally liable for all damages caused to the consumer by the ingestion of the cannabis or cannabis product.

(3) An online marketplace that engages in unlawful paid online advertising related to sellers of intoxicating hemp products in violation of paragraph (1) and is a substantial factor in an unlawful transaction between a consumer and a seller of an intoxicating hemp product shall be jointly and severally liable for all damages caused to the consumer by the ingestion of the intoxicating hemp product.

(c) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (d), in an action brought pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) for harm to a consumer caused by the ingestion of cannabis or a cannabis product purchased from an unlicensed seller of cannabis products, a prevailing plaintiff may, in addition to any other remedy at law, recover as a civil penalty up to two times the damages caused by the cannabis or cannabis product if the online marketplace
 had actual knowledge that the seller that offered the cannabis or cannabis product was not licensed. For purposes of this paragraph, receipt of a report pursuant to Section 22943.2 or 22944.2 of the Business and Professions Code may be a basis for obtaining knowledge.

(2) Except as provided in subdivision (d), in an action brought pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) for harm to a consumer caused by the ingestion of an intoxicating hemp
 product, a prevailing plaintiff may, in addition to any other remedy at law, recover as a civil penalty up to two times the damages caused by the intoxicating hemp product if the online marketplace had actual knowledge that the product was an intoxicating hemp product. For purposes of this paragraph, receipt of a report pursuant to Section 22943.2 or 22944.2 of the Business and Professions Code may be a basis for obtaining knowledge.

(d) (1) In an action described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), a prevailing plaintiff may, in addition to any other remedy at law, recover as a civil penalty up to three times the damages suffered by a child caused by the ingestion of cannabis or a cannabis product if the online marketplace had actual knowledge at the time the marketplace facilitated the connection that the seller that offered the cannabis or cannabis product was not licensed.
 For purposes of this paragraph, receipt of a report pursuant to Section 22943.2 or 22944.2 of the Business and Professions Code may be a basis for obtaining knowledge.

(2) In an action described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), a prevailing plaintiff may, in addition to any other remedy at law, recover as a civil penalty up to three times the damages suffered by a child caused by the ingestion of the intoxicating hemp product if the online marketplace
 had actual knowledge at the time the marketplace facilitated the connection that the product was an intoxicating hemp product. For purposes of this paragraph, receipt of a report pursuant to Section 22943.2 or 22944.2 of the Business and Professions Code may be a basis for obtaining knowledge.

(e) This section shall not be construed as applying to information or content displayed by a business on a computer or mobile device when the content does not satisfy the definition of
 unlawful paid online advertisement.

(f) (1) In a civil action brought pursuant to
 subdivision (b), (c), or (d) against an online marketplace in relation to cannabis or cannabis products, it is a complete affirmative defense if the online marketplace establishes, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following:

(A) The online marketplace had, at the time the allegedly harmful product was sold, in full force and effect, a policy and practice of verifying that each seller of cannabis or cannabis products had a license.

(B) The seller had a valid, unexpired license at the time of the sale.

(C) The online marketplace never had custody or control of the cannabis or cannabis product.

(2) In a
 civil action brought pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) against an online marketplace in relation to intoxicating hemp products, it is a complete affirmative defense if the online marketplace establishes, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following:

(A) The defendant had, at the time the allegedly harmful product was sold, in full force and effect, a policy and practice of requiring offers to sell a product containing hemp to describe the product as “THC free” or “nonintoxicating,” or
 to contain that statement “[Insert online marketplace name] does not permit the sale of intoxicating hemp,”
 where those words appear in the largest text visible to the public describing or identifying the product and are either of the following:

(i) In the same size and style as the largest text visible to the public describing or identifying the product.

(ii) Clearly and conspicuously disclosed as a part of the largest text visible to the public describing or identifying the product.

(B) The disclosure described by subparagraph (A) existed at the time the product was sold to the consumer.

(C) The defendant never had custody or control of the product.

(3) In a civil action brought pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) against an online marketplace in relation to intoxicating hemp products, it is a complete affirmative defense if the online marketplace establishes, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following:

(A) The defendant did not know or should not have known from the information it obtained from the seller, including the description of the product, that the hemp was intoxicating.

(B) The defendant never had custody or control of the allegedly harmful product.

(4) In a civil action brought pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d) against an online marketplace in relation to intoxicating hemp products, it is a complete affirmative defense if the online marketplace establishes, by clear and convincing evidence, all of the following:

(A) The defendant received a report pursuant to the mechanism required by Section
 22944.2 of the Business and Professions Code that the seller of the intoxicating hemp product alleged to have caused the injury was selling intoxicating hemp.

(B) Prior to the sale of the intoxicating hemp product alleged to have caused the injury, the defendant did either of the following:

(i) Required the disclosure described in paragraph
 (2).

(ii) Removed the seller from their marketplace.

(5) (A) In a civil action brought pursuant to subdivisions (b), (c), or (d) against an online marketplace in relation to intoxicating hemp products, it is a complete affirmative defense if the online marketplace establishes, by clear and convincing evidence, that the marketplace did either of the following:

(i) Prior to the action being filed, within 48 hours of the online marketplace knowing it was violating paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (b), removed the product description that offered the intoxicating hemp that is alleged to have caused the harm from the marketplace, and the product description remained removed from the marketplace without interruption until the time the action was filed.

(ii) Prior to the action being filed, within 48 hours of the online marketplace knowing it was violating paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), inserted or caused to be inserted into the product description of the product that is alleged to have caused the harm disclosures that describe the product as “THC free” or “nonintoxicating,” or “[Insert marketplace name] does not permit the sale of intoxicating hemp,” where the words “THC free” or “nonintoxicating” or “[Iinsert marketplace name] does not permit the sale of intoxicating hemp,” appear in the largest text visible to the public describing or identifying the product, those words appeared on the product description without
 interruption until the time the action was filed, and those words are either of the following:

(I) In the same size and style as the largest text visible to the public describing or identifying the product.

(II) Clearly and conspicuously disclosed as a part of the largest text visible to the public describing or identifying the product.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, receipt of a report pursuant to Section 22943.2 or 22944.2 of the Business and Professions Code may be a basis for obtaining knowledge.

(g) In any action brought pursuant to this section, an online marketplace may, notwithstanding any provision in an agreement or contract, seek in the same action indemnification against an advertiser
 of cannabis, cannabis products, or intoxicating hemp products that misrepresented to the online marketplace that they were licensed or registered to sell that product, or misrepresented to the online marketplace that they were a seller of nonintoxicating hemp.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 411, Sec. 4.   (SB 378)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.5.

(a) There shall be no liability on the part of one, including the State of California, county, city and county, city or any other political subdivision of the State of California, who owns or maintains any building or premises which have been designated as a shelter from destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States by any disaster council or any public office, body, or officer of this state or of the United States, or which have been designated
 or are used as mass care centers, first aid stations, temporary hospital annexes, or as other necessary facilities for mitigating the effects of a natural, manmade, or war-caused emergency, for any injuries arising out of the use thereof for such purposes sustained by any person while in or upon said building or premises as a result of the condition of said building or premises or as a result of any act or omission, or in any way arising from the designation of such premises as a shelter, or the designation or use thereof as a mass care center, first aid station, temporary hospital annex, or other necessary facility for emergency purposes, except a willful act, of such owner or occupant or his or her servants, agents or employees when such person has entered or gone upon or into said building or premises for the purpose of seeking refuge, treatment, care, or assistance therein during destructive operations or attacks by enemies of the United States or during tests ordered by lawful authority or during a
 natural or manmade emergency.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no disaster service worker who is performing disaster services during a state of war emergency, a state of emergency, or a local emergency, as such emergencies are defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, shall be liable for civil damages on account of personal injury to or death of any person or damage to property resulting from any act or omission while performing disaster services anywhere within any jurisdiction covered by such emergency, except one that is willful.

(c) For purposes of this subdivision, a disaster service worker shall be performing disaster services when acting within the scope of the disaster service worker’s responsibilities under the authority of the governmental emergency organization.

(d) For purposes of
 this subdivision, “governmental emergency organization” shall mean the emergency organization of any state, city, city and county, county, district, or other local governmental agency or public agency, which is authorized pursuant to the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter any existing legal duties or obligations. The amendments to this section made by the act amending this section shall apply exclusively to any legal action filed on or after the effective date of the act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 27, Sec. 1.   Effective August 6, 2009.   Note: Provisions of subd. (e) were inserted by the amendment by Stats. 2009, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.55.

(a) A retail or wholesale service provider of telecommunications service, or other service, involved in providing 9-1-1 service in accordance with the Warren-911-Emergency Assistance Act (Article 6 (commencing with Section 53100) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), shall not be liable for any civil claim, damage, or loss caused by an act or omission in the design, development, installation, maintenance, or provision of 9-1-1
 service, unless the act or omission that proximately caused the claim, damage, or loss constituted gross negligence, wanton or willful misconduct, or intentional misconduct.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Public safety agency” means a public safety agency as defined in accordance with the Warren-911-Emergency Assistance Act (Article 6 (commencing with Section 53100) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(2) “9-1-1 service” means a telecommunications service, or other wireline or wireless service, that provides to the user of the public telephone system the ability to reach a public safety agency by utilizing the digits 9-1-1 or otherwise facilitates the provision of emergency services pursuant to the Warren-911-Emergency Assistance Act (Article 6 (commencing with Section
 53100) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). “9-1-1 service” includes a 9-1-1 service that utilizes in whole or in part an Internet Protocol.

(c) This section shall not apply to services provided under tariff.

(d) This section shall not be construed to modify the liability of a manufacturer, distributor, or other person arising from a claim, damage, or loss, related to the operation or performance of an end-user device that is not related to the provision of 9-1-1 service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 297, Sec. 1.   (AB 1074)   Effective September 21, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.6.

The violation of any statute or ordinance shall not establish negligence as a matter of law where the act or omission involved was required in order to comply with an order or proclamation of any military commander who is authorized to issue such orders or proclamations; nor when the act or omission involved is required in order to comply with any regulation, directive, or order of the Governor promulgated under the California Emergency Services Act. No person shall be prosecuted for a violation of any statute or ordinance when violation of such statute or ordinance is required in order to comply with an order or proclamation of any military commander who is authorized to
 issue such orders or proclamations; nor shall any person be prosecuted for a violation of any statute or ordinance when violation of such statute or ordinance is required in order to comply with any regulation, directive, or order of the Governor promulgated under the California Emergency Services Act. The provisions of this section shall apply to such acts or omissions whether occurring prior to or after the effective date of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 438.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.7.

No person who is injured while getting on, or attempting to get on, a moving locomotive or railroad car, without authority from the owner or operator of the railroad, or who, having gotten on a locomotive or railroad car while in motion without such authority, is injured while so riding or getting off, shall recover any damages from the owner or operator thereof for such injuries unless proximately caused by an intentional act of such owner or operator with knowledge that serious injury is the probable result of such act, or with a wanton and reckless disregard of the probable result of such act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1554.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.8.

(a) No health care provider shall be liable for professional negligence or malpractice for any occurrence or result solely on the basis that the occurrence or result was caused by the natural course of a disease or condition, or was the natural or expected result of reasonable treatment rendered for the disease or condition. This section shall not be construed so as to limit liability for the failure to inform of the risks of treatment or failure to accept treatment, or for negligent diagnosis or treatment or the negligent failure to diagnose or treat.

(b) As used in this section, “health
 care provider” means any person licensed or certified pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of the Business and Professions Code, or licensed pursuant to the Osteopathic Initiative Act or the Chiropractic Initiative Act, or certified pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 1440) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code, and any clinic, health dispensary, or health facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1358.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.9.

(a) Notwithstanding statutory or decisional law to the contrary, any person is responsible not only for the results of that person’s willful acts causing injury to a peace officer, firefighter, or any emergency medical personnel employed by a public entity, but also for any injury occasioned to that person by the want of ordinary care or skill in the management of the person’s property or person, in any of the following situations:

(1) Where the conduct causing the injury
 occurs after the person knows or should have known of the presence of the peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical personnel.

(2) Where the conduct causing injury violates a statute, ordinance, or regulation, and the conduct causing injury was itself not the event that precipitated either the response or presence of the peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical personnel.

(3) Where the conduct causing the injury was intended to injure the peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical personnel.

(4) Where the conduct causing the injury is arson as defined in Section 451 of the Penal Code.

(b) This section does not preclude the reduction of an award of damages because of the comparative fault of the peace officer, firefighter, or
 emergency medical personnel in causing the injury.

(c) The employer of a firefighter, peace officer or emergency medical personnel may be subrogated to the rights granted by this section to the extent of the worker’s compensation benefits, and other liabilities of the employer, including all salary, wage, pension, or other emolument paid to the employee or the employee’s dependents.

(d) The liability imposed by this section shall not apply to an employer of a peace officer, firefighter, or emergency medical personnel.

(e) This section is not intended to change or modify the common law independent cause exception to the firefighter’s rule as set forth in Donohue v. San Francisco Housing Authority (1993) 16 Cal.App.4th 658.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 140, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.10.

(a) No cause of action against an attorney for a civil conspiracy with his or her client arising from any attempt to contest or compromise a claim or dispute, and which is based upon the attorney’s representation of the client, shall be included in a complaint or other pleading unless the court enters an order allowing the pleading that includes the claim for civil conspiracy to be filed after the court determines that the party seeking to file the pleading has established that there is a reasonable probability that the party will prevail
 in the action. The court may allow the filing of a pleading claiming liability based upon such a civil conspiracy following the filing of a verified petition therefor accompanied by the proposed pleading and supporting affidavits stating the facts upon which the liability is based. The court shall order service of the petition upon the party against whom the action is proposed to be filed and permit that party to submit opposing affidavits prior to making its determination. The filing of the petition, proposed pleading, and accompanying affidavits shall toll the running of any applicable statute of limitations until the final determination of the matter, which ruling, if favorable to the petitioning party, shall permit the proposed pleading to be filed.

(b) Failure to obtain a court order where required by subdivision (a) shall be a defense to any action for civil conspiracy filed in violation thereof. The defense shall be raised by the
 attorney charged with civil conspiracy upon that attorney’s first appearance by demurrer, motion to strike, or such other motion or application as may be appropriate. Failure to timely raise the defense shall constitute a waiver thereof.

(c) This section shall not apply to a cause of action against an attorney for a civil conspiracy with his or her client, where (1) the attorney has an independent legal duty to the plaintiff, or (2) the attorney’s acts go beyond the performance of a professional duty to serve the client and involve a conspiracy to violate a legal duty in furtherance of the attorney’s financial gain.

(d) This section establishes a special proceeding of a civil nature. Any order made under subdivision (a), (b), or (c) which determines the rights of a petitioner or an attorney against whom a pleading has been or is proposed to be filed, shall be appealable as a final
 judgment in a civil action.

(e) Subdivision (d) does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 472, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1714.11.

(a) Except for damage or injury proximately caused by a grossly negligent act or omission or willful or wanton misconduct of the donor, no public employee or public entity, including, but not limited to, a fire department, a fire protection district, or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, that donates fire protection apparatus or equipment to a volunteer fire department, volunteer fire protection district, or volunteer fire company is liable for any damage or injury that results from the use of that apparatus or equipment by the
 recipient fire department, fire protection district, or fire company.

(b) (1) The immunity provided by this section only shall apply if the donor of the fire protection apparatus or equipment discloses in writing to the recipient fire department, fire protection district, or fire company any known damage to, or deficiencies in, the apparatus and equipment.

(2) A volunteer fire department, volunteer fire protection district, or volunteer fire company that receives donated fire protection apparatus or equipment shall inspect and repair the apparatus and equipment prior to use for public safety purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1715.

Other obligations are prescribed by Divisions I and II of this Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1716.

(a) It is unlawful for a person to solicit payment of money by another by means of a written statement or invoice, or any writing that reasonably could be considered a bill, invoice, or statement of account due, but is in fact a solicitation for an order, unless the solicitation conforms to subdivisions (b) to (f), inclusive. 

(b) A solicitation described in subdivision (a) shall bear on its face either the disclaimer prescribed by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subsection
 (d) of Section 3001 of Title 39 of the United States Code or the following notice:

“THIS IS NOT A BILL. THIS IS A SOLICITATION. YOU ARE UNDER NO OBLIGATION TO PAY THE AMOUNT STATED ABOVE UNLESS YOU ACCEPT THIS OFFER.”

The statutory disclaimer or the alternative notice shall be displayed in conspicuous boldface capital letters of a color prominently contrasting with the background against which they appear, including all other print on the face of the solicitation and shall be at least as large, bold, and conspicuous as any other print on the face of the solicitation but no smaller than 30-point type.

(c) The notice or disclaimer required by this section shall be displayed conspicuously apart from other print on the page and immediately below each portion of the solicitation that reasonably could be construed to specify a monetary amount due and payable by the
 recipient. The notice or disclaimer shall not be preceded, followed, or surrounded by words, symbols, or other matter that reduces its conspicuousness or that introduces, modifies, qualifies, or explains the required text, such as “legal notice required by law.”

(d) The notice or disclaimer may not, by folding or any other device, be rendered unintelligible or less prominent than any other information on the face of the solicitation.

(e) If a solicitation consists of more than one page or if any page is designed to be separated into portions, such as by tearing along a perforated line, the notice or disclaimer shall be displayed in its entirety on the face of each page or portion of a page that reasonably might be considered a bill, invoice, or statement of account due as required by subdivisions (b) and (c).

(f) For
 the purposes of this section, “color” includes black and “color prominently contrasting” excludes any color, or any intensity of an otherwise included color, that does not permit legible reproduction by ordinary office photocopying equipment used under normal operating conditions, and that is not at least as vivid as any other color on the face of the solicitation.

(g) Any person damaged by noncompliance with this section, in addition to other remedies, is entitled to damages in an amount equal to three times the sum solicited.

(h) Any person who violates this section shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each violation, which shall be assessed and recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General or by any district attorney, county counsel, or city attorney in any court
 of competent jurisdiction. If the action is brought by the Attorney General, one-half of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered and one-half to the State Treasurer. If brought by a district attorney or county counsel, the entire amount of the penalty collected shall be paid to the treasurer of the county in which the judgment was entered. If brought by a city attorney or city prosecutor, one-half of the penalty shall be paid to the treasurer of the county and one-half to the city.

(i) A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 397, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.

(a) In any action on a contract, where the contract specifically provides that attorney’s fees and costs, which are incurred to enforce that contract, shall be awarded either to one of the parties or to the prevailing party, then the party who is determined to be the party prevailing on the contract, whether he or she is the party specified in the contract or not, shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees in addition to other costs.

Where a contract provides for attorney’s fees, as set forth above, that provision shall be construed as applying to the entire contract, unless each party
 was represented by counsel in the negotiation and execution of the contract, and the fact of that representation is specified in the contract.

Reasonable attorney’s fees shall be fixed by the court, and shall be an element of the costs of suit.

Attorney’s fees provided for by this section shall not be subject to waiver by the parties to any contract which is entered into after the effective date of this section. Any provision in any such contract which provides for a waiver of attorney’s fees is void.

(b) (1) The court, upon notice and motion by a party, shall determine who is the party prevailing on the contract for purposes of this section, whether or not the suit proceeds to final judgment. Except as provided in paragraph (2), the party prevailing on the contract shall be the party who recovered a greater relief in the action on the
 contract. The court may also determine that there is no party prevailing on the contract for purposes of this section.

(2) Where an action has been voluntarily dismissed or dismissed pursuant to a settlement of the case, there shall be no prevailing party for purposes of this section.

Where the defendant alleges in his or her answer that he or she tendered to the plaintiff the full amount to which he or she was entitled, and thereupon deposits in court for the plaintiff, the amount so tendered, and the allegation is found to be true, then the defendant is deemed to be a party prevailing on the contract within the meaning of this section.

Where a deposit has been made pursuant to this section, the court shall, on the application of any party to the action, order the deposit to be invested in an insured, interest-bearing account. Interest on the amount shall be
 allocated to the parties in the same proportion as the original funds are allocated.

(c) In an action which seeks relief in addition to that based on a contract, if the party prevailing on the contract has damages awarded against it on causes of action not on the contract, the amounts awarded to the party prevailing on the contract under this section shall be deducted from any damages awarded in favor of the party who did not prevail on the contract. If the amount awarded under this section exceeds the amount of damages awarded the party not prevailing on the contract, the net amount shall be awarded the party prevailing on the contract and judgment may be entered in favor of the party prevailing on the contract for that net amount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1080, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1717.5.

(a) (1) Except as otherwise provided by law or where waived by the parties to an agreement, in any action on a contract based on a book account, as defined in Section 337a of the Code of Civil Procedure, entered into on or after January 1, 1987, which does not provide for attorney’s fees and costs, as provided in Section 1717, the party who is determined to be the party prevailing on the contract shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees, as provided below, in addition to other costs. The prevailing party on the contract shall be the party who recovered a greater relief in the action on the contract. The court may determine that there is no party prevailing on the contract for purposes of this
 section.

(2) Reasonable attorney’s fees awarded pursuant to this section for the prevailing party bringing the action on the book account shall be fixed by the court in an amount that shall not exceed the lesser of: (1) one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200)
 for book accounts based upon an obligation owing by a natural person for goods, moneys, or services which were primarily for personal, family, or household purposes; and one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) for all other book accounts to which this section applies; or (2) 25 percent of the principal obligation owing under the contract.

(3) For the party against whom the obligation on the book account was asserted in the action subject to this section, if that party is found to have no obligation owing on a book account, the court shall award that prevailing party reasonable attorney’s fees not to exceed one thousand two hundred dollars ($1,200) for book accounts based upon an obligation owing by a natural person for goods, moneys, or services which were primarily for personal, family, or household purposes, and one thousand
 six hundred dollars
 ($1,600) for all other book accounts to which this section applies. These attorney’s fees shall be an element of the costs of the suit.

(4) If there is a written agreement between the parties signed by the person to be charged, the fees provided by this section may not be imposed unless that agreement contains a statement that the prevailing party in any action between the parties is entitled to the fees provided by this section.

(b) The attorney’s fees allowed pursuant to this section shall be
 the lesser of either the maximum amount allowed by this section, the amount provided by any default attorney’s fee schedule adopted by the court applicable to the suit, or an amount as otherwise provided by the court. Any claim for attorney’s fees pursuant to this section in excess of the amounts set forth in the default attorney’s fee schedule shall be reasonable attorney’s fees, as proved by the party, as actual and necessary for the claim that is subject to this section.

(c) (1) This section does not apply to any action in which an insurance company is a party nor shall an insurance company, surety, or guarantor be liable under this section, in the absence of a specific contractual provision, for the attorney’s fees and costs awarded a prevailing party against its insured.

(2) This section does not apply to any action in which a bank, a savings association, a federal association, a state or federal credit union, or a subsidiary, affiliate, or holding company of any of those entities, or an authorized industrial loan company, a licensed consumer finance lender, or a licensed commercial finance lender, is a party.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 28, Sec. 1.   (AB 78)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1718.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Farm machinery” means all tools and equipment used in relation to the operation of a farm.

(2) “Farm machinery repair shop” means a business which, for compensation, engages in the operation, on or off its premises, of repairing farm machinery.

(3) “Per-job basis” means each act of maintenance or repair which is performed on farm machinery.

(b) All work done by a
 farm machinery repair shop, including all warranty work, shall be recorded on an invoice, which shall describe all service work done and parts supplied. If more than one act of maintenance or repair is performed by a farm machinery repair shop, the invoice shall be written in such a way that the labor cost per hour and total labor cost, as well as the specific parts used and their cost, shall be recorded on a per-job basis.

However, where work is done on an agreed total-cost-per-job basis, or the work includes an agreed total cost for component unit replacement, the invoice shall describe the work done on such basis and the total cost for such work.

(c) Each farm machinery repair shop shall give to each customer, upon request, a written estimated price for labor and parts necessary, on a per-job basis. It shall not charge for work done or parts supplied in excess of the estimated price without the
 consent of the customer, which shall be obtained at some time after it is determined that the estimated price is insufficient and before the work not included in the estimate is done, or the parts not included in the estimate are supplied. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a farm machinery repair shop to give a written estimated price if the shop does not agree to perform the requested repair.

(d) Any violation of this section is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

1719.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any penal sanctions that may apply, any person who passes a check on insufficient funds shall be liable to the payee for the amount of the check and a service charge payable to the payee for an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for the first check passed on insufficient funds and an amount not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35) for each subsequent check to that payee passed on insufficient funds.

(2) Notwithstanding